Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.498

Deposit of moneys from RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495.

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 must be deposited into the construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 shall be deposited in the general fund.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 11 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 51.44.190.